Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-5701
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-5701 to 77-5735 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Advantage Act.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 23;

Laws 2008, LB895, § 6;

Laws 2009, LB403, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB1118, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB954, § 1.
July 18, 2026